src/nouns_masculine.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +Nom +Mas +Sg +Pl

LEXICON Root
Noun;

Lexicon Noun
Masculine;

LEXICON Masculine

gat			MascNomInf;
noi 		MascNomInf;
ome			MascNomInf;
fill		MascNomInf;
capità		MascNomInf;
padrí		MascNomInf;
carbó		MascNomInf;
fanal		MascNomInf;
cantant		MascNomInf;
pare		MascNomInf;


LEXICON MascNomInf
+Nom+Mas+Sg:0	#;
+Nom+Mas+Pl:^s	#;
